North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122. Hospitals for the Mentally Disordered. [Repealed]
§§ 122-1 through 122-122.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 589, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

As to comparable sections of repealed Chapter 122 and new Chapter 122C, see the table at the end of Chapter 122C.

Session Laws 1985, c. 589, s. 63(g) provided that any person serving as a guardian under the authority of former G.S. 122-24.1 would continue to serve as guardian notwithstanding the repeal of that section.

Session Laws 1985, c. 589, s. 63(k) provided that substance abusers committed as outpatients pursuant to G.S. 122-58.7A:1 or G.S. 122-58.8 prior to the effective date of the act (January 1, 1986) would not be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 122C-290

through 122C-293 and that if appropriate, new involuntary commitment proceedings could be instituted regarding such individuals pursuant to

G.S. 122C-281

through 122C-289.

Session Laws 1985, c. 589, s. 63(n) provided that any ordinance, rule, or regulation made under G.S. 122-95 and in effect on December 31, 1985, would continue in effect until amended, modified, or repealed by the Secretary of Human Resources under

G.S. 122C-403

.

Repealed G.S. 122-55.8 was amended by Session Laws 1985, c. 99, effective April 16, 1985. Repealed G.S. 122-98.3 was amended by Session Laws 1985, c. 408, s. 2, effective July 1, 1985, and by Session Laws 1985, c. 408, s. 4, effective July 4, 1985.